Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2194.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 121A.201, is amended to read: 121A.201 MTSS AND COLLABORATIVE MINNESOTA PARTNERSHIPS TO ADVANCE STUDENT SUCCESS (COMPASS). new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given: new text end new text begin (1) new text end new text begin "COMPASS" means the Collaborative Minnesota Partnership to Advance Student Success; and new text end new text begin (2) "MTSS" means Multitiered System of Support. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin COMPASS. new text end deleted text begin Beginning July 1, 2023, all Minnesota school districts and charter schools must be offered training and support in implementing MTSS through the Department of Education COMPASS team and the Department of Education's regional partners, the Minnesota Service Cooperatives.deleted text end COMPASS is deleted text begin the statedeleted text end new text begin Minnesota'snew text end school improvement model providing a statewide system through which all districts and schools may receive support in the areas of literacy, math, social-emotional learning, and mental health within the MTSS framework. new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin MTSS. new text end The MTSS framework is the state's systemic, continuous school improvement framework for ensuring positive social, emotional, behavioral, developmental, and academic outcomes for every student. MTSS provides access to layered tiers of culturally and linguistically responsive, evidence-based practices. The MTSS framework relies on the understanding and belief that every student can learn and thrive, and it engages an anti-bias and socially just approach to examining policies and practices and ensuring equitable distribution of resources and opportunity. The MTSS systemic framework requires: (1) a district-wide infrastructure consisting of effective leaders, collective efficacy among staff, positive school climate, linked teams, and professional learning that supports continuous improvement; (2) authentic engagement with families and communities to develop reciprocal relationships and build new opportunities for students together; (3) multilayered tiers of culturally and linguistically responsive instruction and support that allows every student the support they need to reach meaningful and rigorous learning standards. Tiers of support include core (Tier 1), supplemental (Tier 2), and intensive (Tier 3) instruction levels; (4) valid and reliable assessment tools and processes to assess student and system performance and inform necessary changes; and (5) a data-based decision-making approach in which problems are precisely defined and analyzed, solutions address root causes, and implementation is monitored to ensure success. The data-based problem-solving component of the MTSS framework consists of three major subcomponents: accessible and integrated data, decision-making process, and system performance. new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Training and support provided. new text end new text begin The Department of Education COMPASS team and the department's regional partners, the Minnesota Service Cooperatives, must offer Minnesota school districts and charter schools training and support in implementing MTSS. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin COMPASS and MTSS support. new text end new text begin Support for school districts, charter schools, and cooperative units under this subdivision may include but is not limited to: new text end new text begin (1) partnering with the Minnesota Service Cooperatives to support districts in implementing COMPASS to support schools in the areas of literacy, math, social-emotional learning, mental health, and graduation using the MTSS framework; new text end new text begin (2) providing support to districts and charter schools identified under section 120B.11; new text end new text begin (3) providing support to districts and charter schools in streamlining various applications, reports, and submissions to the Department of Education through One Plan; new text end new text begin (4) providing training, guidance, and implementation resources for MTSS, including a universal screening process approved by the Department of Education to identify students who may be at risk of experiencing academic, behavioral, and social-emotional development difficulties, including an early warning indicator of being off track for graduation by the end of grade 9; new text end new text begin (5) providing guidance to convene school-based teams to analyze data provided by screenings and resources for related identification, instruction, and intervention methods; new text end new text begin (6) providing dyslexia screening and intervention that are evidence-based; new text end new text begin (7) requiring school districts and charter schools to provide parents of students identified in screenings with notice of screening findings and related support information; new text end new text begin (8) requiring districts and charter schools to provide at-risk students with interventions and to monitor the effectiveness of these interventions and student progress, including progress toward graduation; and new text end new text begin (9) developing and annually reporting findings regarding the implementation of MTSS. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Funding. new text end new text begin State funding for COMPASS must be used for the following purposes: new text end new text begin (1) to support implementation of MTSS and COMPASS. Funding must be used to support increased capacity at the Department of Education and the Minnesota Service Cooperatives for implementation supports; new text end new text begin (2) to provide grants to school districts, charter schools, and cooperative units as defined in section 123A.24, subdivision 2, for implementation of MTSS, including: (i) hiring local MTSS coordinators; (ii) deferring costs for personnel to participate in cohort activities and professional learning; and (iii) piloting a Department of Education One Plan, the consolidation of multiple reporting structures to streamline various applications, reports, and submissions by school districts and charter schools; new text end new text begin (3) to develop a regional network focusing on mathematics to provide dedicated mathematics trainers and coaches to train regional support staff from the Minnesota Service Cooperatives to support school leaders and teachers to implement evidence-based instructional strategies in mathematics. Funding may also be used to host an annual Mathematics Standards-Based Instructional Institute; and new text end new text begin (4) for the University of Minnesota Center for Applied Research and Educational Improvement to support implementation and evaluation of the MTSS framework. new text end